dictionaries/he_IL/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX  13965 Y 1
SFX  13965 ם נחנו/64992 .
SFX  13725 Y 1
SFX  13725 0 חיכן/64992 .
SFX  9177 Y 1
SFX  9177 0 רתני/64991 .
SFX  6536 Y 1
SFX  6536 0 חיכן/64993 .
SFX  7282 Y 1
SFX  7282 0 רתני/64992 .
SFX  11919 Y 1
SFX  11919 ח יסו/64992 .
SFX  5403 Y 1
SFX  5403 0 נוכן/64992 .
SFX  9510 Y 1
SFX  9510 0 טתיכן/64992 .
SFX  12006 Y 1
SFX  12006 0 יבנו/64991 .
SFX  11435 Y 1
SFX  11435 ח יסו/64999 .
SFX  6839 Y 1
SFX  6839 0 יבנו/64992 .
SFX  10627 Y 1
SFX  10627 0 יבנו/64993 .
SFX  10413 Y 1
SFX  10413 0 סד/64991 .
SFX  7018 Y 1
SFX  7018 0 סד/64992 .
SFX  9585 Y 1
SFX  9585 0 יתון/64992 .
SFX  10082 Y 1
SFX  10082 0 יבנו/64998 .
SFX  12832 Y 1
SFX  12832 0 יתכן/64991 .
SFX  7809 Y 1
SFX  7809 0 יתכן/64992 .
SFX  6037 Y 1
SFX  6037 0 יתכן/64993 .
SFX  12158 Y 1
SFX  12158 ר תן/64991 .
SFX  5644 Y 1
SFX  5644 ר תן/64992 .
SFX  10004 Y 1
SFX  10004 0 עונו/64992 .
SFX  5426 Y 1
SFX  5426 ר תן/64993 .
SFX  8895 Y 1
SFX  8895 0 עונו/64993 .
SFX  9966 Y 1
SFX  9966 ל מדו/64992 .
SFX  11825 Y 1
SFX  11825 0 ונך/64992 .
SFX  6272 Y 1
SFX  6272 0 תיך/64991 .
SFX  10471 Y 1
SFX  10471 ל מדו/64995 .
SFX  10347 Y 1
SFX  10347 ר תן/64998 .
SFX  5155 Y 1
SFX  5155 0 ונך/64993 .
SFX  5385 Y 1
SFX  5385 0 תיך/64992 .
SFX  11422 Y 1
SFX  11422 ר תן/64999 .
SFX  5218 Y 1
SFX  5218 0 תיך/64993 .
SFX  12965 Y 1
SFX  12965 0 יתיה/64991 .
SFX  11370 Y 1
SFX  11370 ה ותינו/64993 .
SFX  10754 Y 1
SFX  10754 0 יתיה/64992 .
SFX  12073 Y 1
SFX  12073 0 יתיה/64993 .
SFX  11321 Y 1
SFX  11321 ל מדו/64999 .
SFX  11070 Y 1
SFX  11070 0 בוני/64992 .
SFX  13219 Y 1
SFX  13219 0 בוני/64993 .
SFX  11682 Y 1
SFX  11682 0 לין/64991 .
SFX  9581 Y 1
SFX  9581 0 יתיה/64994 .
SFX  13579 Y 1
SFX  13579 0 לין/64992 .
SFX  8589 Y 1
SFX  8589 0 לין/64993 .
SFX  6261 Y 1
SFX  6261 0 זהו/64992 .
SFX  13378 Y 1
SFX  13378 0 ינום/64991 .
SFX  10290 Y 1
SFX  10290 0 לין/64994 .
SFX  10762 Y 1
SFX  10762 0 ינום/64992 .
SFX  13809 Y 1
SFX  13809 ו זרי/64992 .
SFX  13251 Y 1
SFX  13251 ו זרי/64993 .
SFX  6496 Y 1
SFX  6496 ף פץ/64992 .
SFX  12590 Y 1
SFX  12590 ח טרת/64991 .
SFX  8243 Y 1
SFX  8243 0 מכן/64991 .
SFX  9978 Y 1
SFX  9978 ח טרת/64992 .
SFX  5033 Y 1
SFX  5033 0 מכן/64992 .
SFX  6144 Y 1
SFX  6144 0 מכן/64993 .
SFX  12775 Y 1
SFX  12775 0 ותנו/64991 .
SFX  9349 Y 1
SFX  9349 ם מתך/64992 .
SFX  11595 Y 1
SFX  11595 0 ותנו/64992 .
SFX  8296 Y 1
SFX  8296 0 מיהם/64991 .
SFX  5187 Y 1
SFX  5187 0 ותנו/64993 .
SFX  7671 Y 1
SFX  7671 ח יד/64992 .
SFX  7256 Y 1
SFX  7256 ו ית/64991 .
SFX  6151 Y 1
SFX  6151 0 מיהם/64993 .
SFX  7072 Y 1
SFX  7072 0 מכן/64998 .
SFX  12122 Y 1
SFX  12122 0 נותיהן/64991 .
SFX  10746 Y 1
SFX  10746 0 ותנו/64996 .
SFX  10302 Y 1
SFX  10302 ח יד/64993 .
SFX  7034 Y 1
SFX  7034 ו ית/64992 .
SFX  7363 Y 1
SFX  7363 0 ושיך/64993 .
SFX  5915 Y 1
SFX  5915 0 פוכן/64992 .
SFX  9875 Y 1
SFX  9875 0 ותנו/64998 .
SFX  7131 Y 1
SFX  7131 0 נותיהן/64993 .
SFX  13745 Y 1
SFX  13745 ע פכן/64991 .
SFX  12435 Y 1
SFX  12435 0 יעיה/64991 .
SFX  10672 Y 1
SFX  10672 0 בתום/64992 .
SFX  7961 Y 1
SFX  7961 ע פכן/64992 .
SFX  13609 Y 1
SFX  13609 0 יעיה/64992 .
SFX  10522 Y 1
SFX  10522 ע פכן/64993 .
SFX  13822 Y 1
SFX  13822 0 צין/64992 .
SFX  13154 Y 1
SFX  13154 0 יעיה/64993 .
SFX  9452 Y 1
SFX  9452 0 יעיה/64994 .
SFX  9122 Y 1
SFX  9122 0 סותיכן/64991 .
SFX  10877 Y 1
SFX  10877 0 צין/64994 .
SFX  11786 Y 1
SFX  11786 ח מר/64992 .
SFX  7841 Y 1
SFX  7841 0 סותיכן/64993 .
SFX  10493 Y 1
SFX  10493 ע פכן/64998 .
SFX  12047 Y 1
SFX  12047 ד יר/64991 .
SFX  8462 Y 1
SFX  8462 0 תיותך/64993 .
SFX  11748 Y 1
SFX  11748 ח ינכן/64992 .
SFX  5814 Y 1
SFX  5814 ד יר/64992 .
SFX  11198 Y 1
SFX  11198 ח ינכן/64993 .
SFX  10598 Y 1
SFX  10598 ד יר/64993 .
SFX  12805 Y 1
SFX  12805 0 ררת/64991 .
SFX  9012 Y 1
SFX  9012 0 ררת/64992 .
SFX  11562 Y 1
SFX  11562 0 בינו/64991 .
SFX  11457 Y 1
SFX  11457 0 בינו/64992 .
SFX  5260 Y 1
SFX  5260 0 בינו/64993 .
SFX  11068 Y 1
SFX  11068 0 בינו/64994 .
SFX  6378 Y 1
SFX  6378 ע פן/64991 .
SFX  6494 Y 1
SFX  6494 ע פן/64992 .
SFX  10520 Y 1
SFX  10520 ע פן/64993 .
SFX  8283 Y 1
SFX  8283 0 עותינו/64991 .
SFX  8541 Y 1
SFX  8541 0 עותינו/64993 .
SFX  11378 Y 1
SFX  11378 ה ותיה/64993 .
SFX  13279 Y 1
SFX  13279 0 יוניי/64993 .
SFX  10492 Y 1
SFX  10492 ע פן/64998 .
SFX  8842 Y 1
SFX  8842 0 חוהו/64992 .
SFX  12326 Y 1
SFX  12326 0 דם/64991 .
SFX  5324 Y 1
SFX  5324 0 דם/64992 .
SFX  6994 Y 1
SFX  6994 0 דם/64993 .
SFX  7184 Y 1
SFX  7184 ה נוה/64992 .
SFX  5445 Y 1
SFX  5445 0 רי/64991 .
SFX  13539 Y 1
SFX  13539 0 רי/64992 .
SFX  5737 Y 1
SFX  5737 0 רי/64993 .
SFX  10441 Y 1
SFX  10441 0 רי/64994 .
SFX  6643 Y 1
SFX  6643 ל ננה/64992 .
SFX  7081 Y 1
SFX  7081 0 דם/64998 .
SFX  6221 Y 1
SFX  6221 0 זנו/64991 .
SFX  6762 Y 1
SFX  6762 0 רי/64995 .
SFX  6650 Y 1
SFX  6650 0 זנו/64992 .
SFX  12839 Y 1
SFX  12839 0 יקן/64991 .
SFX  5769 Y 1
SFX  5769 0 זנו/64993 .
SFX  11813 Y 1
SFX  11813 ב וביהן/64993 .
SFX  5680 Y 1
SFX  5680 0 יקן/64992 .
SFX  13895 Y 1
SFX  13895 0 רי/64999 .
SFX  9742 Y 1
SFX  9742 0 יקן/64993 .
SFX  8712 Y 1
SFX  8712 0 לינו/64991 .
SFX  13576 Y 1
SFX  13576 0 לינו/64992 .
SFX  13281 Y 1
SFX  13281 ן פש/64992 .
SFX  11051 Y 1
SFX  11051 0 ימות/64991 .
SFX  6168 Y 1
SFX  6168 0 ינו/64991 .
SFX  5805 Y 1
SFX  5805 0 לינו/64993 .
SFX  5923 Y 1
SFX  5923 0 ינו/64992 .
SFX  11362 Y 1
SFX  11362 ל ננה/64999 .
SFX  11113 Y 1
SFX  11113 0 זנו/64998 .
SFX  10280 Y 1
SFX  10280 0 לינו/64994 .
SFX  5334 Y 1
SFX  5334 0 ינו/64993 .
SFX  6567 Y 1
SFX  6567 0 קל/64991 .
SFX  5090 Y 1
SFX  5090 0 ינו/64994 .
SFX  9317 Y 1
SFX  9317 0 יקן/64998 .
SFX  6618 Y 1
SFX  6618 0 קל/64992 .
SFX  11451 Y 1
SFX  11451 0 קל/64993 .
SFX  7815 Y 1
SFX  7815 0 ינו/64999 .
SFX  6878 Y 1
SFX  6878 0 מותם/64993 .
SFX  8769 Y 1
SFX  8769 0 ילות/64991 .
SFX  9759 Y 1
SFX  9759 0 יקוהו/64992 .
SFX  8266 Y 1
SFX  8266 0 מותינו/64991 .
SFX  13228 Y 1
SFX  13228 0 יצכם/64991 .
SFX  7511 Y 1
SFX  7511 0 יצכם/64992 .
SFX  6866 Y 1
SFX  6866 0 מותינו/64993 .
SFX  12859 Y 1
SFX  12859 ל מתנו/64991 .
SFX  10867 Y 1
SFX  10867 0 יצכם/64993 .
SFX  7595 Y 1
SFX  7595 0 צה/64991 .
SFX  9990 Y 1
SFX  9990 ל מתנו/64992 .
SFX  6129 Y 1
SFX  6129 0 ותיך/64991 .
SFX  6796 Y 1
SFX  6796 0 צה/64992 .
SFX  11102 Y 1
SFX  11102 ל מתנו/64993 .
SFX  7158 Y 1
SFX  7158 0 צה/64993 .
SFX  8291 Y 1
SFX  8291 0 עותיה/64991 .
SFX  5114 Y 1
SFX  5114 0 ותיך/64993 .
SFX  11902 Y 1
SFX  11902 ח ירן/64992 .
SFX  11243 Y 1
SFX  11243 ח ירן/64993 .
SFX  11094 Y 1
SFX  11094 0 יצכם/64998 .
SFX  8549 Y 1
SFX  8549 0 עותיה/64993 .
SFX  8484 Y 1
SFX  8484 0 וליכם/64993 .
SFX  11778 Y 1
SFX  11778 ב ום/64991 .
SFX  10507 Y 1
SFX  10507 0 צה/64998 .
SFX  11206 Y 1
SFX  11206 0 צה/64999 .
SFX  7730 Y 1
SFX  7730 ב ום/64992 .
SFX  13340 Y 1
SFX  13340 ב ום/64994 .
SFX  6659 Y 1
SFX  6659 0 וחן/64993 .
SFX  9770 Y 1
SFX  9770 0 קתיה/64992 .
SFX  6890 Y 1
SFX  6890 0 מויותיי/64993 .
SFX  13488 Y 1
SFX  13488 י מנה/64991 .
SFX  7761 Y 1
SFX  7761 י מנה/64992 .
SFX  12706 Y 1
SFX  12706 0 יטיך/64991 .
SFX  8562 Y 1
SFX  8562 י מנה/64994 .
SFX  13497 Y 1
SFX  13497 0 יטיך/64993 .
SFX  9208 Y 1
SFX  9208 0 שותיי/64991 .
SFX  9344 Y 1
SFX  9344 ם מתם/64992 .
SFX  8951 Y 1
SFX  8951 0 שותיי/64993 .
SFX  11364 Y 1
SFX  11364 י מנה/64999 .
SFX  10691 Y 1
SFX  10691 0 בנוכם/64992 .
SFX  12368 Y 1
SFX  12368 0 גתם/64991 .
SFX  9009 Y 1
SFX  9009 0 גתם/64992 .
SFX  13881 Y 1
SFX  13881 ך לנה/64992 .
SFX  8027 Y 1
SFX  8027 0 גתם/64993 .
SFX  7305 Y 1
SFX  7305 0 רתינו/64992 .
SFX  6504 Y 1
SFX  6504 0 ג/64991 .
SFX  5947 Y 1
SFX  5947 0 ג/64992 .
SFX  10912 Y 1
SFX  10912 0 ג/64993 .
SFX  9410 Y 1
SFX  9410 0 ג/64994 .
SFX  11934 Y 1
SFX  11934 0 תותייך/64991 .
SFX  12629 Y 1
SFX  12629 0 טותינו/64991 .
SFX  8989 Y 1
SFX  8989 0 ג/64996 .
SFX  10529 Y 1
SFX  10529 0 ג/64997 .
SFX  9174 Y 1
SFX  9174 0 רותיהם/64991 .
SFX  7626 Y 1
SFX  7626 0 תותייך/64993 .
SFX  6454 Y 1
SFX  6454 0 טותינו/64993 .
SFX  5758 Y 1
SFX  5758 0 רותיהם/64993 .
SFX  6636 Y 1
SFX  6636 0 יותה/64993 .
SFX  12394 Y 1
SFX  12394 0 גותייך/64991 .
SFX  10666 Y 1
SFX  10666 0 יבוכן/64992 .
SFX  8802 Y 1
SFX  8802 0 לוכן/64992 .
SFX  7743 Y 1
SFX  7743 0 מון/64991 .
SFX  9260 Y 1
SFX  9260 0 מון/64992 .
SFX  8050 Y 1
SFX  8050 0 גותייך/64993 .
SFX  11266 Y 1
SFX  11266 0 ניתן/64992 .
SFX  6423 Y 1
SFX  6423 0 ניתן/64993 .
SFX  13178 Y 1
SFX  13178 0 קש/64991 .
SFX  5524 Y 1
SFX  5524 0 ונותיכן/64993 .
SFX  13330 Y 1
SFX  13330 ף פל/64992 .
SFX  5320 Y 1
SFX  5320 0 קש/64992 .
SFX  8141 Y 1
SFX  8141 ן פר/64992 .
SFX  8587 Y 1
SFX  8587 0 קר/64991 .
SFX  5314 Y 1
SFX  5314 0 קר/64992 .
SFX  13221 Y 1
SFX  13221 0 ללו/64991 .
SFX  11717 Y 1
SFX  11717 0 ללו/64992 .
SFX  13361 Y 1
SFX  13361 ה ומנו/64993 .
SFX  12799 Y 1
SFX  12799 0 ללו/64993 .
SFX  8080 Y 1
SFX  8080 0 דיות/64991 .
SFX  7425 Y 1
SFX  7425 ח יף/64992 .
SFX  10304 Y 1
SFX  10304 ח יף/64993 .
SFX  12214 Y 1
SFX  12214 0 יחתן/64991 .
SFX  10720 Y 1
SFX  10720 0 יחתן/64992 .
SFX  11328 Y 1
SFX  11328 0 ללו/64999 .
SFX  9054 Y 1
SFX  9054 0 קתך/64991 .
SFX  11689 Y 1
SFX  11689 ש תרו/64992 .
SFX  10148 Y 1
SFX  10148 0 קתך/64992 .
SFX  5270 Y 1
SFX  5270 0 קתך/64993 .
SFX  13114 Y 1
SFX  13114 ב ימנו/64991 .
SFX  12209 Y 1
SFX  12209 0 יחיה/64991 .
SFX  7444 Y 1
SFX  7444 ב ימנו/64992 .
SFX  13935 Y 1
SFX  13935 0 יחיה/64992 .
SFX  10267 Y 1
SFX  10267 ב ימנו/64993 .
SFX  13087 Y 1
SFX  13087 0 חרר/64991 .
SFX  10716 Y 1
SFX  10716 0 יחיה/64994 .
SFX  8092 Y 1
SFX  8092 0 חרר/64992 .
SFX  11000 Y 1
SFX  11000 0 חרר/64993 .
SFX  8807 Y 1
SFX  8807 0 לתים/64992 .
SFX  13069 Y 1
SFX  13069 ח יחתו/64991 .
SFX  9392 Y 1
SFX  9392 ח יחתו/64992 .
SFX  12555 Y 1
SFX  12555 0 יפתכם/64991 .
SFX  9139 Y 1
SFX  9139 ך כות/64991 .
SFX  12423 Y 1
SFX  12423 0 יעכן/64991 .
SFX  10131 Y 1
SFX  10131 0 יפתכם/64992 .
SFX  13148 Y 1
SFX  13148 ט יטתכן/64991 .
SFX  5610 Y 1
SFX  5610 0 יעכן/64992 .
SFX  10050 Y 1
SFX  10050 ט יטתכן/64992 .
SFX  9419 Y 1
SFX  9419 0 יעכן/64993 .
SFX  12480 Y 1
SFX  12480 0 ידנו/64991 .
SFX  9134 Y 1
SFX  9134 ך כו/64992 .
SFX  10568 Y 1
SFX  10568 ך כו/64993 .
SFX  6557 Y 1
SFX  6557 0 ידנו/64992 .
SFX  10813 Y 1
SFX  10813 0 ידנו/64993 .
SFX  11629 Y 1
SFX  11629 0 ובינו/64993 .
SFX  10419 Y 1
SFX  10419 ך כו/64995 .
SFX  11041 Y 1
SFX  11041 0 יעכן/64998 .
SFX  9214 Y 1
SFX  9214 0 שתני/64991 .
SFX  5532 Y 1
SFX  5532 0 ונותיה/64993 .
SFX  7299 Y 1
SFX  7299 0 שתני/64992 .
SFX  11162 Y 1
SFX  11162 ך כו/64999 .
SFX  10185 Y 1
SFX  10185 0 ידנו/64998 .
SFX  12987 Y 1
SFX  12987 ן סן/64991 .
SFX  11036 Y 1
SFX  11036 0 ידנו/64999 .
SFX  6084 Y 1
SFX  6084 ן סן/64992 .
SFX  6238 Y 1
SFX  6238 0 זותיכם/64991 .
SFX  12299 Y 1
SFX  12299 0 ילותינו/64991 .
SFX  6743 Y 1
SFX  6743 0 זותיכם/64993 .
SFX  8770 Y 1
SFX  8770 0 ילותינו/64993 .
SFX  8707 Y 1
SFX  8707 0 לכן/64991 .
SFX  12268 Y 1
SFX  12268 0 ילתם/64991 .
SFX  5199 Y 1
SFX  5199 0 לכן/64992 .
SFX  9634 Y 1
SFX  9634 0 ילתם/64992 .
SFX  5802 Y 1
SFX  5802 0 לכן/64993 .
SFX  8761 Y 1
SFX  8761 0 ילתם/64993 .
SFX  7298 Y 1
SFX  7298 0 שוה/64992 .
SFX  10096 Y 1
SFX  10096 0 לכן/64998 .
SFX  8363 Y 1
SFX  8363 0 אינו/64991 .
SFX  6367 Y 1
SFX  6367 0 ייתך/64993 .
SFX  12662 Y 1
SFX  12662 0 ישתן/64991 .
SFX  11272 Y 1
SFX  11272 0 אינו/64992 .
SFX  10238 Y 1
SFX  10238 0 ישתן/64992 .
SFX  8111 Y 1
SFX  8111 0 אינו/64993 .
SFX  11710 Y 1
SFX  11710 ח ידו/64992 .
SFX  10247 Y 1
SFX  10247 0 אינו/64994 .
SFX  10303 Y 1
SFX  10303 ח ידו/64993 .
SFX  9653 Y 1
SFX  9653 0 ילתהו/64992 .
SFX  8838 Y 1
SFX  8838 0 חוני/64992 .
SFX  7322 Y 1
SFX  7322 0 רנום/64992 .
SFX  13167 Y 1
SFX  13167 0 חוני/64993 .
SFX  12142 Y 1
SFX  12142 ר שתן/64991 .
SFX  8333 Y 1
SFX  8333 ר שתן/64992 .
SFX  8394 Y 1
SFX  8394 ר שתן/64993 .
SFX  13728 Y 1
SFX  13728 0 חיני/64992 .
SFX  7687 Y 1
SFX  7687 0 שיים/64991 .
SFX  9803 Y 1
SFX  9803 0 חיני/64994 .
SFX  8347 Y 1
SFX  8347 0 אך/64991 .
SFX  6382 Y 1
SFX  6382 ם נק/64992 .
SFX  12858 Y 1
SFX  12858 ל מתו/64991 .
SFX  5505 Y 1
SFX  5505 0 אך/64992 .
SFX  9988 Y 1
SFX  9988 ל מתו/64992 .
SFX  5356 Y 1
SFX  5356 0 אך/64993 .
